Utah statutes.
58-9-603.    Loss of right of disposition.

(1)  As used in this section, "estranged" means a physical and emotional separation from the decedent at the time of death which has existed for a period of time that clearly demonstrates an absence of affection, trust, and regard for the decedent.

(2)  A person who has a right of disposition under this chapter forfeits that right and the right is passed on to the next qualifying person as listed in Section 58-9-602 under the following circumstances:

(a)  the person is charged with first or second degree murder or voluntary manslaughter in connection with the decedent's death, and the charges are known by the funeral service director, except that if the charges against the person are dropped or if the person is acquitted of the charges, the right of disposition is returned to the person;

(b)  the person does not exercise the person's right of disposition within three days of notification of the decedent's death or within five days of the decedent's death, whichever is earlier; or

(c)  if a probate court under Section 58-9-605 determines that the person entitled to the right of disposition and the decedent were estranged at the time of death.

